Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-159
Injury or death while on active duty; workers' compensation benefits; procedure; exceptions.

A member of the military forces of the State of Nebraska who incurs a personal injury which is caused by accident or occupational disease while in the active service of this state ordered by competent authority, which injury arises out of and in the course of his or her employment in active service, shall be entitled to workers' compensation benefits in accordance with the definitions and terms of the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act. If such member incurs death under the same conditions, the dependents of the deceased, if any, shall be entitled to workers' compensation benefits as provided in the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act. Any dispute arising under this section shall be resolved under the provisions established by the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act. No workers' compensation benefits shall be paid under this section in any case to the extent that any benefits for injury or death are paid or payable under the provisions of 32 U.S.C.

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 57, p. 1599;

Laws 1974, LB 983, § 6;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 139.

Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, see section 48-1,110.